California statutes. Education Code
The board of library trustees shall purchase real property, and erect or rent and equip, such buildings or rooms, as in its judgment are necessary properly to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19465.

The board of library trustees shall require the Secretary of State and other state officials to furnish the library with copies of any and all reports, laws, and other publications of the state not otherwise disposed of by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19466.

The board of library trustees shall borrow books from, lend books to, and exchange books with other libraries, and may allow nonresidents of the district to borrow books upon such conditions as the board may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19467.

The board of library trustees shall borrow money, give security therefor, purchase on contract, and do and perform any and all other acts and things necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19468.

The board of library trustees shall file, through the librarian, on or before the last day of August of each year, a report with the State Librarian at Sacramento giving the condition of its library and the number of volumes contained therein on the 30th day of June preceding. The report shall, in addition to other matters deemed expedient by the board of trustees or the district librarian, contain such statistical and other information as is deemed desirable by the State Librarian. For this purpose the State Librarian may send to the several district librarians instructions or question blanks so as to obtain the material for a comparative study of library conditions in the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19469.

The board of library trustees shall designate the hours during which the library shall be open for the use of the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 354, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

19470.

Annually, at least 15 days before the first day of the month in which county taxes are levied, the board of library trustees of each library district shall furnish to the board of supervisors of the county in which the district or any part thereof is situated, an estimate in writing of the amount of money necessary for all purposes required under this chapter during the next ensuing fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19473.

The tax shall be computed, entered upon the tax rolls, and collected in the same manner as county taxes are computed, entered, and collected. All money collected shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the particular library district fund and shall be paid out on the order of the district board, signed by the president and secretary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19475.

All money acquired by gift, devise, bequest, or otherwise, for the purposes of the library, shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the library fund of the district, subject only to the order of the library trustees of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19476.

If the payment into the treasury is inconsistent with the terms or conditions of any gift, devise, or bequest, the board of library trustees shall provide for the safety and preservation of the fund, and the application thereof to the use of the library, in accordance with the terms and conditions of the gift, devise, or bequest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19477.

Upon the receipt by the county auditor of an order of the library trustees of the district, he shall issue his warrant upon the county treasurer for the amount stated in the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19478.

When any warrant is presented to the treasurer for payment and it is not paid for want of funds, the treasurer shall endorse thereon “not paid for want of funds” with the date of presentation and sign his name thereto, and from that time the warrant bears interest at the rate of 6 percent per annum until it is paid or until funds are available for its payment and the county treasurer gives notice to the warrant holder that funds are available for the payment. The giving of the notice is deemed complete upon deposit thereof in the United States mail in a sealed envelope addressed to the warrant holder at his address given by him at the time of presentation of the warrant to the treasurer, with postage thereon fully prepaid and registered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19479.

Every library established under this chapter shall be forever free to the inhabitants and nonresident taxpayers of the library district, subject always to such rules, regulations, and bylaws as may be made by the board of library trustees. For violation of any rule, regulation, or bylaw a person may be fined or excluded from the privileges of the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19480.

The title to all property acquired for the purposes of the library, when not inconsistent with the terms of its acquisition, or not otherwise designated, vests in the district in which the library is or is to be situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19481.

Every library district shall be designated by the name and style of ____ Library District (using the name of the district) of ____ County (using the name of the county or counties in which the district is situated). In that name the trustees may sue and be sued, and may hold and convey property for the use and benefit of the district. A number shall not be used as a part of the designation of any library district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19482.

The board of library trustees and the boards of trustees of neighboring library districts, or the governing bodies of neighboring cities, or boards of supervisors of counties in which public libraries are situated, may contract to lend the books of libraries created under this chapter to residents of the counties, neighboring cities, or library districts, upon a reasonable compensation to be paid by the counties, neighboring cities, or library districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19483.

Anything in Sections 19100 to 19179, inclusive, to the contrary, notwithstanding, the property in any library district created under this chapter subsequent to the establishment of a county free library is subject to taxation for county free library purposes as though the library district had not been created. This section shall not apply to any adjustments in property tax allocations made pursuant to Section 19116.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 522, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 522.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Claims [19500. - 19500.]

19500.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Biennial Election of Trustees [19510. - 19515.]

19510.

An election shall be held biennially in each library district for the election of one or more library trustees who shall hold office for four years beginning on the last Friday in November next succeeding his election. This election shall be held in the district on the same day as the school district election as specified in Section 5000 in the odd-numbered years. Trustees shall be nominated in the manner prescribed in Section 5012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1376.)
-------------------------------------------

19511.

To be qualified to vote at any library district election a person shall be registered to vote in the library district, at least 29 days before the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1376.)
-------------------------------------------

19514.

If pursuant to Section 5327 a district election is not held, the board of supervisors of the county in which the district, or the largest part thereof in area, is situated shall at its next regular meeting appoint to the positions of trustee those persons nominated, and such persons shall qualify, take office, and serve exactly as if elected at a general district election. If no person has been nominated, the board of supervisors shall appoint any qualified voter of the district to the position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 334.)
-------------------------------------------

19515.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5300) of Part 4 of this division shall govern and control the conduct of elections pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Bonds [19520. - 19532.]

19520.

The board of trustees of any library district may, when in their judgment it is deemed advisable, and shall, upon a petition of 50 or more taxpayers and residents of the library district, call an election and submit to the electors of the district, the proposition of whether the bonds of the district will be issued and sold for the purpose of raising money for any or all of the following:

(a) The purchase of suitable lots.

(b) Procuring plans and specifications and erecting a suitable building.

(c) Furnishing and equipping the building and fencing and ornamenting the grounds, for the accommodation of the public library.

(d) Any or all of the purposes of this chapter.

(e) Liquidating any indebtedness incurred for the purposes.

(f) Refunding any outstanding valid indebtedness, evidenced by bonds or warrants of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19521.

The bond election shall be called and conducted and the results thereof canvassed, returned, and declared in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5300) of Part 4 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

19522.

The board of trustees shall set forth in the resolution calling for a bond election the amount and denomination of the bonds, the rate of interest, and the number of years that all or any part of the bonds are to run.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

19524.

If it appears that two-thirds of the votes cast at the election were cast in favor of issuing the bonds, the board shall enter the fact upon its minutes and shall certify all the proceedings to the supervising board of supervisors. Thereupon the board of supervisors shall issue the bonds of the district, in the number and amount provided in the proceedings, and the district shall be named on the bonds. The bonds shall be paid out of the building fund of the district.

The money for the redemption of the bonds and the payment of interest thereon shall be raised by taxation upon the taxable property in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

19525.

The total amount of bonds issued shall not exceed 5 percent of the assessed value of the property of the district, prior to the 1980–81 fiscal year and shall not exceed 1.25 percent of the assessed value of the district beginning after the 1981–82 fiscal year, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the county or counties in which the district is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1208, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

19526.

The supervising board of supervisors by an order entered upon its minutes shall prescribe the form of the bonds and of the interest coupons attached thereto, and shall fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal of the bonds shall be payable, which shall not be more than 40 years from the date thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19527.

The bonds shall not bear a greater amount of interest than 6 percent, to be payable annually or semiannually. The bonds shall be sold in the manner prescribed by the board of supervisors, but for not less than par, and the proceeds of the sale thereof shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the building fund of the library district, and shall be drawn out for the purposes for which the bonds were issued as other library money is drawn out.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19528.

The board of supervisors of each county in which any part of the district is situated, at the time of making the levy of taxes for county purposes, shall levy a tax for that year upon the taxable property in the district, at the equalized assessed value thereof for that year, for the interest and redemption of the bonds. The tax shall not be less than sufficient to pay the interest of the bonds for that year, and such portion of the principal as is to become due during the year. In any event the tax shall be high enough to raise, annually, for the first half of the term the bonds are to run, a sufficient sum to pay the interest thereon, and during the balance of the term, high enough to pay the annual interest and to pay, annually, a proportion of the principal of the bonds equal to a sum produced by taking the whole amount of the bonds outstanding and dividing it by the number of years the bonds then have to run.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19529.

All money levied, when collected, shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the library district, and shall be used for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds, and for no other purpose. The principal and interest on the bonds shall be paid by the county treasurer, upon the warrant of the county auditor, out of the fund provided therefor. The county auditor shall cancel and file with the county treasurer the bonds and coupons as rapidly as they are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19530.

Whenever any bonds issued under this article remain unsold for the period of six months after having been offered for sale in the manner prescribed by the supervising board of supervisors, the board of trustees of the library district for or on account of which the bonds were issued, or of any library district composed wholly or partly of territory which, at the time of holding the election authorizing the issuance of the bonds, was embraced within the district for or on account of which the bonds were issued, may petition the supervising board of supervisors to cause the unsold bonds to be withdrawn from the market and canceled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19531.

Upon receiving the petition, signed by a majority of the members of the board of trustees, the supervising board of supervisors shall fix a time for hearing the petition, which shall be not more than 30 days thereafter, and shall cause a notice, stating the time and place of hearing, and the object of the petition in general terms, to be published as provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19532.

At the time and place designated in the notice for hearing the petition, or at any subsequent time to which the hearing is postponed, the supervising board of supervisors shall hear any reasons that are submitted for or against the granting of the petition, and if they deem it for the best interests of the library district named in the petition that the unsold bonds be canceled, they shall make and enter an order in the minutes of their proceedings that the unsold bonds be canceled. Thereupon the bonds, and the vote by which they were authorized to be issued, shall cease to be of any validity whatever.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Library Districts and Museums in Unincorporated Towns and Villages [19600. - 19734.]



  ARTICLE 1. Formation [19600. - 19614.]

19600.

Any unincorporated town or village of this state may establish, equip, and maintain a public library for the dissemination of knowledge of the arts, sciences, and general literature, in accordance with this chapter. Any unincorporated town or village of this state may also establish, equip, and maintain a public museum in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19601.

Upon the application, by petition, of 50 or more taxpayers and residents of any unincorporated town or village to the board of supervisors in the county in which the town or village is located, for the formation of a library district, and setting forth the boundaries of the proposed district, the board of supervisors shall, within 10 days after receiving the petition, by resolution, order that an election be held in the proposed district for the determination of the question and shall conduct the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

19603.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19604.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19608.

The election shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of this state, where applicable, without reference to form of ballot or manner of voting. The ballot shall contain the words “Shall the library district be established?” To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the proposal. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 6.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19610.

The election officers shall report the result of the election to the board of supervisors within five days after the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19611.

If a majority of the votes at the election is in favor of a library district, the board of supervisors shall by resolution, establish the library district, and shall appoint five trustees, who shall be qualified electors and residents within the limits of the district, to be known as a board of library trustees of the town or village for which they are appointed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19612.

Vacancies shall be filled by the board of supervisors by appointment for the unexpired term.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19613.

If a majority of the votes cast is against a library district, the board of supervisors shall, by order, so declare, and no other proceedings shall be taken in relation thereto until the expiration of one year from the date of presentation of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19614.

The fact of the presentation of the petition, and the order establishing the library district and making the appointment of the five library trustees, shall be entered in the minutes of the board of supervisors and shall be conclusive evidence of the due presentation of a proper petition, and that each of the petitioners was, at the time of signature and presentation of the petition, a taxpayer and resident of the proposed district, and of the fact and regularity of all prior proceedings of every kind and nature provided for by this article and of the existence and validity of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers [19640. - 19664.]

19640.

The board of library trustees shall meet at least once a month, at such time and place as it may fix by resolution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19641.

Special meetings may be called at any time by three trustees, by written notices served upon each member at least 12 hours before the time specified for the meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19642.

Three members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19643.

At its first meeting held after the general district election the board shall organize by electing one of its number president, and another one of its number secretary. They shall serve as such for one year or until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19644.

The board shall cause a proper record of its proceedings to be kept, and at the first meeting of the board of trustees, it shall immediately cause to be made out and filed with the State Librarian a certificate showing that the library has been established, with the date thereof, the names of the trustees, and the officers of the board chosen for the current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 133.)
-------------------------------------------

19645.

The board of library trustees shall make and enforce all rules, regulations, and bylaws necessary for the administration, government, and protection of the library under its management, and all property belonging to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19646.

The board of library trustees shall administer any trust declared or created for the library, and receive by gift, devise, or bequest, and hold in trust or otherwise, property situated in this state or elsewhere, and where not otherwise provided, dispose of the property for the benefit of the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19647.

The board of library trustees shall prescribe the duties and powers of the librarian, secretary, and other officers and employees of the library, determine the number of and appoint all officers and employees, and fix their compensation. The officers and employees shall hold their offices and positions at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19648.

The board of library trustees shall purchase necessary books, journals, publications, and other personal property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19649.

The board of library trustees shall also purchase such real property, and erect or rent and equip, such building or rooms, as in its judgment is necessary to properly carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19650.

The board of library trustees may request the appropriate state officials to furnish the library with copies of any and all reports, laws, and other publications of the state not otherwise disposed of by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19651.

The board of library trustees shall borrow books from, lend books to, and exchange books with other libraries. It shall allow nonresidents to borrow books upon such conditions as it may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19652.

The board of library trustees shall do and perform any and all other acts and things necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19653.

The board of library trustees shall file, through the librarian, on or before the last day in the month of August of each year, a report with the State Librarian at Sacramento giving the condition of the library and the number of volumes contained therein on the 30th day of June preceding. The report shall, in addition to other matters deemed expedient by the board of trustees or the librarian, contain such statistical and other information as is deemed desirable by the State Librarian. For this purpose the State Librarian may send to the several district librarians instructions or question blanks so as to obtain the material for a comparative study of library conditions in the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19654.

The board of library trustees shall designate the hours during which the library is open for the use of the public. All public libraries established under this chapter shall be open for the use of the public during every day in the year except on such legal holidays as may be determined by the board of library trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19655.

In any library district formed under the provisions of this chapter, which maintains a public library, or which has petitioned for and been granted permission to establish, and intends to maintain a public library in accordance with this chapter, the board of library trustees shall furnish to the board of supervisors of the county in which the library district is situated, each and every year, on or before the first day of September, an estimate of the cost of any or all of the following:

(a) Leasing temporary quarters.

(b) Purchasing a suitable lot.

(c) Procuring plans and specifications and erecting a suitable building.

(d) Furnishing and equipping the building and fencing and ornamenting the grounds, for the accommodation of the public library.

(e) Conducting and maintaining the library for the ensuing fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19656.

The board of library trustees may, when in its judgment it is deemed advisable, and upon the petition of 50 or more taxpayers residing within the library district shall, call an election and submit to the electors of the library district the question of whether the bonds of the library district shall be issued and sold for any or all the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19658.

The revenue derived from the tax, together with all money acquired by gift, devise, bequest, or otherwise, for the purposes of the library, shall be paid into the county treasury, to the credit of the library fund of the district in which the tax is collected, subject only to the order of the library trustees of the district. If payment into the treasury is inconsistent with the terms or conditions of any gift, devise, or bequest, the board of library trustees shall provide for the safety and preservation of the fund, and the application thereof to the use of the library, in accordance with the terms and conditions of the gift, devise, or bequest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19659.

Upon the receipt by the county auditor of an order of the library trustees of the district he shall issue his warrant upon the county treasurer for the amount stated in the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19660.

When any warrant is presented to the treasurer for payment and it is not paid for want of funds the treasurer shall endorse thereon “not paid for want of funds” with the date of presentation and sign his name thereto and from that time the warrant bears interest at the rate of 6 percent per annum until it is paid or until funds are available for its payment and the county treasurer gives notice to the warrant holder that funds are available for payment. The giving of the notice is deemed complete upon deposit thereof in the United States mail in a sealed envelope addressed to the warrant holder at his address given by him at the time of presentation of the warrant to the treasurer, with postage thereon fully prepaid and registered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19661.

Every library established under this chapter shall be forever free to the inhabitants and nonresident taxpayers of the library district, subject always to such rules, regulations, and bylaws as may be made by the board of library trustees. For any violation of the rules, regulations, or bylaws a person may be fined or excluded from the privileges of the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19662.

Boards of library trustees and the boards of trustees of neighboring library districts, or the legislative bodies of neighboring municipalities, or boards of supervisors of the counties in which public libraries are situated, may contract to lend the books of the libraries to residents of the counties or neighboring municipalities, or library districts, upon a reasonable compensation to be paid by the counties, neighboring municipalities, or library districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19663.

The title to all property acquired for the purposes of the libraries, when not inconsistent with the terms of its acquisition, or not otherwise designated, vests in the district in which libraries are, or are to be situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19664.

Every library district shall be designated by the name and style of ____ Library District, (using the name of the district), of ____ County, (using the name of the county in which the district is situated). In that name the trustees may sue and be sued, and may hold and convey property for the use and benefit of the district. A number shall not be used as a part of the designation of any library district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Museums [19670. - 19685.]

19670.

The board of library trustees may vote to establish a public museum in the library district and to constitute the board of library trustees as the board of museum trustees for the purposes of managing such museum in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19671.

The board of museum trustees shall meet at least once a month, at such time and place as it may fix by resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19672.

Special meetings may be called at any time by three trustees, by written notices served upon each member at least 12 hours before the time specified for the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19673.

Three members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19674.

At its first meeting held after being constituted, the board shall organize by electing one of its number president, and another one of its number secretary. They shall serve as such for one year or until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19675.

The board shall cause a proper record of its proceedings to be kept, and at the first meeting of the board of trustees, it shall immediately cause to be made out and filed with the Department of Education at Sacramento a certificate showing that the museum has been established, with the date thereof, the names of the trustees, and the officers of the board chosen for the current fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19676.

The board of museum trustees shall make and enforce all rules, regulations, and bylaws necessary for the administration, government, and protection of the museum under its management, and all property belonging to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19677.

The board of museum trustees shall administer any trust declared or created for the museum, and receive by gift, devise, or bequest, and hold in trust or otherwise, property situated in this state or elsewhere, and where not otherwise provided, dispose of the property for the benefit of the museum.

Any funds from private sources which are used for the support of any public museum established pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in a special fund in the county treasury of the county in which the public museum is located. Such fund shall be under the control of and administered by the board of museum trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19678.

The board of museum trustees shall prescribe the duties and powers of the curator, secretary, and other officers and employees of the museum, determine the number of and appoint all officers and employees, and fix their compensation. The officers and employees shall hold their offices and positions at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19679.

The board of museum trustees shall purchase necessary objects of artistic, scientific, or historical interest, and other personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19680.

The board of museum trustees shall also purchase such real property, and erect or rent and equip, such building or rooms, as in its judgment is necessary to properly carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19681.

The board of museum trustees shall do and perform any and all other acts and things necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19682.

The board of museum trustees shall designate the hours during which the museum is open for the use of the public. All public museums established under this chapter shall be open for the use of the public during every day in the year except on legal holidays as may be determined by the board of museum trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19683.

In any library district formed under the provisions of this chapter, which maintains a public museum, in accordance with this chapter, the board of museum trustees shall furnish to the board of supervisors of the county in which the library district is situated, each and every year, on or before the first day of September, an estimate of the cost of any or all of the following:

(a) Leasing temporary quarters.

(b) Purchasing a suitable lot.

(c) Procuring plans and specifications and erecting a suitable building.

(d) Furnishing and equipping the building and fencing and ornamenting the grounds, for the accommodation of the public museum.

(e) Conducting and maintaining the museum for the ensuing fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19684.

The title to all property acquired for the purposes of the museum, when not inconsistent with the terms of its acquisition, or not otherwise designated, vests in the district in which museums are, or are to be situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

19685.
